Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.06
Health care facility, defined.

Health care facility means hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities, and nursing facilities.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 10;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 244, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 443;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 146;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 62;

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5810;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 10.